lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_te.txt
!================================
LEXICON NounInflVI
!  for noun roots that end in -te
!================================

!-----------------------------------------|
!               ABSOLUTIVE                |
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^0                    PostInflVI; ^[Abs.Pl]:^t                    PostInflVI; ^[Abs.Du]:^k                  PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ka    PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^nka          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^gka        PostInflVI;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^vut          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^put          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^gput       PostInflVI;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^vung         PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^pung         PostInflVI; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^gpung      PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^n            PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^gken       PostInflVI;
                                            ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ten   PostInflVI;                                         |
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^zi           PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^si           PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^gsi        PostInflVI;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^ten          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^gtek       PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nga   PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngi   PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}kek PostInflVI;
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nga  PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngi  PostInflVI;                                         |
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngat  PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngit  PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^gket       PostInflVI;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngat PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngit PostInflVI;                                         |
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngak  PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngik  PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkek       PostInflVI;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngak PostInflVI; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngik PostInflVI;                                         |
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^ni           PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^ni           PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^gni        PostInflVI;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^yeng         PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^teng         PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^gteng      PostInflVI;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^tek          PostInflVI; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^gtek       PostInflVI;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
! %{%.fS%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!------------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^m                     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.Pl]:^t                     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.Du]:^k               PostInflVI;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^gma     PostInflVI;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mta           PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mta           PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemta   PostInflVI;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtung         PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtung         PostInflVI; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtung PostInflVI;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpek          PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpek          PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpek    PostInflVI;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesi         PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesi         PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesi   PostInflVI;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetek        PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetek        PostInflVI; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetek  PostInflVI;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngan   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngan   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVI;
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflVI;                                      |
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVI;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVI;                                      |
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflVI;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVI; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflVI;                                      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmi     PostInflVI;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflVI;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflVI; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflVI;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------------|
!                ABLATIVE MODALIS                 |
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng              PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}neng             PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^gneng                    PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mneng            PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mneng            PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemneng          PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnneng           PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnneng           PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnneng         PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegneng         PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegneng         PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegneng       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeneng          PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeneng          PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeneng          PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegneng         PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegneng         PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegneng         PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesineng        PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesineng        PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesineng        PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegneng       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nganeng   PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}nganeng   PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeneng          PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflVI;                                                   |
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeneng          PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflVI;
                                                    ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmineng          PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggneng        PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegneng         PostInflVI;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflVI; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteneng       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
! %{%.fL%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!-------------------------------------------|
!            LOCATIVE (localis)             |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi              PostInflVI; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}ni             PostInflVI; ^[Loc.Du]:^gni                    PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mni            PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mni            PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemni          PostInflVI;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnni           PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnni           PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnni         PostInflVI;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegni         PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegni         PostInflVI; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegni       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeni          PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeni          PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeni          PostInflVI;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegni         PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegni         PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegni         PostInflVI;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesini        PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesini        PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesini        PostInflVI;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegni       PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegni       PostInflVI; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegni       PostInflVI;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngani   PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngani   PostInflVI; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeni          PostInflVI;
